New Jersey, session 222, A5399.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1994, c.137 (C.2C:25-26.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, whenever a defendant charged with a crime or an offense involving domestic violence is released from custody, the prosecuting agency shall notify the victim. b.    Notification shall also be given to a victim who has been issued a temporary or final restraining order, pursuant to the provisions of the "Prevention of Domestic Violence Act of 1991," P.L.1991, c.261 (C.2C:25-17 et al.), when the person who is the subject of the temporary or final restraining order: (1) is charged with a criminal offense and taken into custody; (2) has been granted pretrial release pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17); (3) has violated a condition of pretrial release imposed pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-22); (4) is incarcerated in a State correctional facility or county jail; (5) is released from a State correctional facility or county jail; or (6) has completed a term of parole supervision. c.     The notification required pursuant to this section shall be automatic and provided through the Statewide Victim Information and Notification Everyday System, set forth in section 2 of P.L.    , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.1994, c.137, s.1) 2.    (New section)  The Attorney General shall maintain an automatic notification system to be known as the Victim Information and Notification Everyday System to provide custody status of any defendant charged with a crime or an offense involving domestic violence, as required pursuant to P.L.   , c.   (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). The Victim Information and Notification Everyday System, established pursuant to Attorney General Law Enforcement Directive No. 2005-5, shall be deemed to satisfy the provisions of P.L. , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    (New section)  The Attorney General, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), may adopt rules, regulations and guidelines to effectuate the purposes of P.L.    , c.   (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4. This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment.